Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 39 Livestock Feedlot Operations

Cross references. —

As to commercial feed, see ch. 13 of this title.

As to feeding untreated garbage to swine, see ch. 27 of this title.

§ 11-39-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“City” means any incorporated municipality including a town;

“Department” means the department of environmental quality and includes any officer or agency within that department;

“Established date of operation” means the date on which a feedlot commenced operating with not more livestock than reasonably could be maintained by the physical facilities existing as of that date. If the physical facilities of the feedlot are subsequently expanded, the established date of operation for each expansion is deemed to be a separate and independent “established date of operation” established as of the date of commencement of the expanded operations, and the commencement of expanded operations shall not divest the feedlot of a previously established date of operation;

“Established date of ownership” means the date of the recording of an appropriate muniment of title establishing the ownership of realty;

“Feedlot” means a lot, yard, corral or other area in which livestock are confined, primarily for the purposes of feeding and growth prior to slaughter. The term does not include areas which are used for the raising of crops or other vegetation and upon which livestock are allowed to graze or feed;

“Livestock” means cattle, sheep, swine, poultry and other animals or fowl which are being produced primarily for use as food or food products for human consumption;

“Materially affects” means prohibits or regulates with respect to the location or the emission of noise, effluent, odors, sewage, waste or similar products resulting from the operation or the location or use of buildings, machinery, vehicles, equipment or other real or personal property used in the operation of a livestock feedlot;

“Nuisance” means and includes public or private nuisance as defined either by statute or by the common law;

“Nuisance action or proceeding” means and includes every action, claim or proceeding, whether brought at law, in equity, or as an administrative proceeding, which is based on nuisance;

“Owner” means the person holding record title to real estate, including both legal and equitable interests under recorded real estate contracts;

“Rule of the department” means a rule adopted by the department and as defined in W.S. 35-11-112(a)(i);

“Zoning requirement” means a regulation or ordinance which has been adopted by a city, county or any special purpose district or authority, and which materially affects the operation of a feedlot. Nothing in this act shall be deemed to empower any agency described in this subsection to make any regulation or ordinance;

“This act” means W.S.

11-39-101

through

11-39-104

.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 59, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-708; W.S. 1977, §

11-44-101

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to the department of environmental quality, see chapter 11 of title 35.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 11-39-102.
When defense to nuisance action available.

In any nuisance action
or proceeding against a feedlot brought by or on behalf of a person
whose date of ownership of realty is subsequent to the established
date of operation of that feedlot, proof of compliance with W.S.

11-39-103

is an absolute defense, if the conditions or circumstances
alleged to constitute a nuisance are subject to regulatory jurisdiction
by political subdivisions or related to the activities of the department
of environmental quality.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 59, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-709; W.S. 1977, §

11-44-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-39-103.
Compliance with rules; applicability thereof; compliance schedule;
exception.

A person who operates a feedlot shall comply with applicable rules of the department in accordance with the provisions of this section. A person complies with this section as a matter of law where no rule of the department exists.

A rule of the department in effect on June 1, 1977 applies to a feedlot with an established date of operation prior to June 1, 1977.

A rule of the department applies to a feedlot with an established date of operation subsequent to the effective date of the rule.

A rule of the department adopted after June 1, 1977 does not apply to a feedlot holding any department of environmental quality permit and having an established date of operation prior to the effective date of the rule until either the expiration of the term of the permit in effect on the effective date of the rule, or twenty (20) years from the established date of operation of the feedlot, whichever time period is greater.

A rule of the department adopted after June 1, 1977 does not apply to a feedlot not previously required to hold a department of environmental quality permit and having an established date of operation prior to the effective date of the rule for either a period of twenty (20) years from the established date of operation of the feedlot or five (5) years from the effective date of the rule, whichever time period is greater.

To achieve compliance with applicable rules the department shall issue an appropriate compliance schedule, and no other provision in this act shall be deemed to empower the department to make any rule.

This section does not apply to limit rules required for delegation of the national pollutant discharge elimination system permit program pursuant to the Federal Water Pollution Control Act [Clean Water Act], title 33, United States Code, chapter 26, as amended, and 40 Code of Federal Regulations, part 124.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 59, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-710; W.S. 1977, §

11-44-103

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Federal Water Pollution Control Act. —

The Federal Water Pollution Control Act, referred to in subsection (g), is commonly known as the Clean Water Act, the provisions of which appear as 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-39-101(a)(xiii).

§ 11-39-104.
Compliance with zoning requirements mandatory; applicability thereof.

A person who operates a feedlot shall comply with applicable zoning requirements in accordance with the provisions of this section. A person complies with this section as a matter of law where no zoning requirement exists.

A zoning requirement applies to a feedlot with an established date of operation subsequent to the effective date of the zoning requirement.

A zoning requirement which is in effect on June 1, 1977 applies to a feedlot with an established date of operation prior to June 1, 1977.

A zoning requirement other than one adopted by a city does not apply to a feedlot with an established date of operation prior to the effective date of the zoning requirement for a period of twenty (20) years from the effective date of that zoning requirement.

A feedlot located within an incorporated area subject to regulation by that city on June 1, 1977 is subject to zoning requirements adopted by the city regardless of the established date of operation of the feedlot.

A zoning requirement adopted by a city does not apply to a feedlot which becomes located within an area subject to regulation by that city by virtue of an incorporation or annexation which takes effect after June 1, 1977 for a period of twenty (20) years from the effective date of the incorporation or annexation.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 59, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-711; W.S. 1977, §

11-44-104

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.